Wisconsin, session 2025, SB731.
do enact as follows:SB731,13Section 1. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. of the statutes is created to read:SB731,1,54121.02 (1) (L) 9. In at least one of grades 9 to 12, provide instruction in human 5organ and blood donation that includes all of the following:SB731,1,66a. The purpose of human organ and blood donation.SB731,1,77b. The statewide and nationwide need for human organ and blood donations.SB731,2,11c. The procedure for participating in human organ and blood donation.SB731,22Section 2. Initial applicability.SB731,2,43(1) The treatment of s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. first applies to curriculum for the 42026-27 school year.SB731,2,55